Idaho, session 2025, H0154.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 41, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4117, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4117. LIVE VIRTUAL INSPECTIONS. (1) Except as otherwise provided
for in this section, the division and local governments shall be authorized
to perform live virtual inspections at their discretion.
(2) When conducting a live virtual inspection pursuant to this section,
the division or a local government shall, with respect to each inspection,
verify the address or physical location of such inspection. Such verifica-
tion may be made by showing the physical address or other identifying fea-
tures of the location within the live virtual inspection.
(3) Neither the division nor local governments shall use virtual in-
spections for structural inspections on buildings that are three (3) stories
or greater.
(4) For purposes of this section, "live virtual inspection" means a
form of visual inspection that uses real time visual or electronic aids to
allow an inspector who is enforcing a building code to perform an inspection
without having to be physically present at the job site during the inspec-
tion.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 41, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-4118, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-4118. INSPECTIONS -- TIMELINESS -- REFUNDS. (1) If an inspection
requested by a permit holder is not performed within fifteen (15) business
days, such permit holder shall be authorized to hire a third-party inspec-
tor to perform such inspection. The costs associated with an inspection con-
ducted by a third-party inspector pursuant to this subsection shall be re-
imbursed by the division or the local government responsible for conducting
such inspection.
(2) The division or a local government shall refund ten percent (10%)
of any permit and inspection fees paid by a permit holder if an inspector or
building code administrator:


(a) Conducts an inspection on the work relating to the permit;
(b) Determines that the work has failed an inspection; and
(c) Fails to, within three (3) days, provide the permit holder or his
agent with a reason for the failure of such inspection pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter.
(3) A third-party inspector under this section shall be certified by
the international code council.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.